North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-39.1 Teachers’ Fund for Retirement

Note.

Chapter 184, 1971 S.L., created the new “Teachers’ Fund for Retirement” and repealed N.D.C.C. ch. 15-39, the “Teachers’ Insurance and Retirement Fund”. However, section 2 of the Act provided that reference could be made to N.D.C.C. ch. 15-39 for the purposes of determining rights under the retirement program which were vested prior to July 1, 1971.

15-39.1-01.
Teachers’ fund for retirement created.

There is hereby created the teachers’ fund for retirement, which, upon the effective date of this chapter shall consist of the following:

All moneys contained in the teachers’ insurance and retirement fund accumulated pursuant to chapter 15-39; and

All moneys thereafter received by the state treasurer under the provisions of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1.

15-39.1-02.
Prior fund terminated.

The teachers’ insurance and retirement fund shall, on July 1, 1971, cease to exist and the board administering said fund shall no longer function. All obligations of the teachers’ insurance and retirement fund must be assumed by the newly created fund.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1.

15-39.1-03.
Rights under prior chapter preserved.

No person may be caused to be deprived of rights vested under the chapter superseded hereby. Any such person may elect to claim the person’s retirement benefits according to the provisions of the retirement program for teachers in effect prior to July 1, 1971.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1.

15-39.1-04.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Actuarial equivalent” means the amount calculated to be of equal actuarial value to the benefit otherwise payable when computed on the basis of actuarial assumptions and methods adopted by the board.

“Beneficiary” means a person, estate, trust, or organization designated in writing by a participating member to receive benefits provided by this plan, in receipt of benefits, or otherwise provided under section 15-39.1-17.

“Board” means the board of trustees of the teachers’ fund for retirement.

“Contract” means a written agreement with a school board or other governing body of a school district or special education unit of this state or a letter of appointment by a state institution, state agency, or other employer participating in the fund.

“Fund” means the teachers’ fund for retirement.

“Interest” as applied to member assessments is an annual rate of six percent compounded monthly and as applied to the repurchase of credit for withdrawn years is six percent compounded annually.

“Normal retirement age” means the age at which a member becomes eligible for monthly lifetime normal unreduced retirement benefits as provided in subsection 1 of section 15-39.1-10.

“Retirement” means cessation of covered employment and acceptance of a benefit under former chapter 15-39, or chapter 15-39.1 or 15-39.2.

“Retirement annuity” means the payments made by the fund to a member after retirement, these payments beginning on the first or fifteenth day of the month following eligibility for a benefit.

“Salary” means a member’s earnings in eligible employment under this chapter for teaching, supervisory, administrative, and extracurricular services during a plan year reported as salary on the member’s federal income tax withholding statements plus any salary reduction or salary deferral amounts under 26 U.S.C. 125, 132(f), 401(k), 403(b), 414(h), or 457, as amended. “Salary” includes amounts paid to members for performance of duties, unless amounts are conditioned on or made in anticipation of an individual member’s retirement or termination. The annual salary of each member taken into account in determining benefit accruals and contributions may not exceed the annual compensation limits established under 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(17)(B), as amended, as adjusted for increases in the cost of living in accordance with 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(17)(B), as amended. A salary maximum is not applicable to members whose participation began before July 1, 1996. “Salary” does not include:

Fringe benefits or side, nonwage, benefits that accompany or are in addition to a member’s employment, including insurance programs, annuities, transportation allowances, housing allowances, meals, lodging, or expense allowances, or other benefits provided by a member’s employer.

Insurance programs, including medical, dental, vision, disability, life, long-term care, workforce safety and insurance, or other insurance premiums or benefits.

Payments for unused sick leave, personal leave, vacation leave, or other unused leave.

Early retirement incentive pay, severance pay, or other payments conditioned on or made in anticipation of retirement or termination.

Teacher’s aide pay, referee pay, bus driver pay, or janitorial pay.

Amounts received by a member in lieu of previously employer-provided benefits or payments that are made on an individual selection basis.

Signing bonuses as defined under section 15.1-09-33.1.

Other benefits or payments not defined in this section which the board determines to be ineligible teachers’ fund for retirement salary.

“State institution” includes North Dakota vision services — school for the blind, the school for the deaf, and the North Dakota youth correctional center.

“Teacher” means:

All persons licensed by the education standards and practices board who are contractually employed in teaching, supervisory, administrative, or extracurricular services by a state institution, multidistrict special education unit, area career and technology center, regional education association, school board, or other governing body of a school district of this state, including superintendents, assistant superintendents, business managers, principals, assistant principals, and special teachers. For purposes of this subdivision, “teacher” includes persons contractually employed by one of the above employers to provide teaching, supervisory, administrative, or extracurricular services to a separate state institution, state agency, multidistrict special education unit, area career and technology center, regional education association, school board, or other governing body of a school district of this state under a third-party contract.

The superintendent of public instruction, assistant superintendents of public instruction, county superintendents, assistant superintendents, supervisors of instruction, the professional staff of the department of career and technical education, the professional staff of the center for distance education, the executive director and professional staff of North Dakota united who are members of the fund on July 1, 1995, the professional staff of an interim school district, and the professional staff of the North Dakota high school activities association who are members of the fund on July 1, 1995.

The executive director and professional staff of the North Dakota council of school administrators who are members of the fund on July 1, 1995, and licensed staff of teachers centers, but only if the person was previously a member of and has credits in the fund.

Employees of institutions under the control and administration of the state board of higher education who are members of the fund on July 16, 1989.

“Tier one grandfathered member” for purposes of sections 15-39.1-10 and 15-39.1-12 means a tier one member who, as of June 30, 2013, is vested as a tier one member in accordance with section 15-39.1-11; and

Is at least fifty-five years of age; or

Has a combined total of years of service credit in the plan and years of age which equals or exceeds sixty-five.

“Tier one member” means a teacher who has credit in the system on July 1, 2008, and has not taken a refund pursuant to section 15-39.1-20 after June 30, 2008.

“Tier one nongrandfathered member” for purposes of sections 15-39.1-10 and 15-39.1-12 means a tier one member who does not qualify as a tier one grandfathered member.

“Tier two member” means a teacher who is not a tier one member.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1975, ch. 150, § 1; 1975, ch. 151, § 9; 1979, ch. 233, § 2; 1981, ch. 190, § 1; 1981, ch. 191, § 1; 1983, ch. 216, § 1; 1985, ch. 218, § 1; 1987, ch. 220, § 1; 1987, ch. 221, § 1; 1989, ch. 217, § 1; 1989, ch. 218, § 1; 1991, ch. 187, § 1; 1993, ch. 191, § 1; 1995, ch. 34, § 10; 1995, ch. 120, § 25; 1995, ch. 186, § 5; 1995, ch. 191, § 1; 1997, ch. 169, § 1; 1999, ch. 162, § 32; 1999, ch. 175, § 1; 2001, ch. 169, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 257, § 6; 2003, ch. 138, § 42; 2003, ch. 140, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 147, § 1; 2007, ch. 156, § 7; 2007, ch. 157, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 162, § 1; 2009, ch. 163, § 1; 2011, ch. 124, § 1; 2011, ch. 125, § 1; 2013, ch. 141, § 1; 2015, ch. 136, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 129, § 3, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 1 of chapter 136, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

15-39.1-05.
Management of fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 4.

Note.

For present provisions, see

N.D.C.C. §

15-39.1-05.2.

15-39.1-05.1.
Board composition — Terms — Voting.

The authority to set policy for the fund rests in a board of trustees composed as follows:

The governor shall appoint, from a list of three nominees submitted to the governor by North Dakota united, two board members who are actively employed as elementary or secondary teachers in full-time positions not classified as school administrators. A board member appointed under this subdivision who terminates employment may not continue to serve as a member of the board.

The governor shall appoint, from a list of three nominees submitted to the governor by the North Dakota council of educational leaders, one board member who is actively employed as a full-time school administrator. A board member appointed under this subdivision who terminates employment may not continue to serve as a member of the board.

The governor shall appoint, from a list of three nominees submitted to the governor by the North Dakota retired teachers association, two board members who are the retired members of the fund.

The state treasurer and the superintendent of public instruction.

All current appointees of the board shall serve the remainder of their terms as members of the board until their terms expire and their successors are appointed. The first newly appointed board member under subdivision a of subsection 1 must be appointed to serve an initial term of four years. The first newly appointed board member under subdivision c of subsection 1 must be elected to serve an initial term of five years. Newly appointed board members shall serve a term of five years. Each newly appointed term begins on July first.

Each board member is entitled to one vote, and four members constitute a quorum. Four votes are required for resolution or action by the board.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 1; 2017, ch. 129, § 4, effective August 1, 2017.

15-39.1-05.2.
Board authority — Continuing appropriation.

The board:

Has the powers and privileges of a corporation, including the right to sue and be sued in its own name. The venue of all actions to which the board is a party must be Burleigh County.

Shall establish investment policy for the trust fund under section 21-10-02.1. The investment policy must include:

Acceptable rates of return, liquidity, and levels of risk; and

Long-range asset allocation targets.

Shall arrange for actuarial and medical consultants. The board shall cause a qualified, competent actuary to be retained on a consulting basis. The actuary shall:

Make a valuation of the liabilities and reserves of the fund and a determination of the contributions required by the fund to discharge its liabilities and pay administrative costs;

Recommend to the board rates of employer and employee contributions required, based upon the entry age normal cost or other accepted actuarial method, to maintain the fund on an actuarial reserve basis;

Once every five years make a general investigation of the actuarial experience under the fund, including mortality, retirement, employment turnover, and other items required by the board;

Recommend actuarial tables for use in valuations and in calculating actuarial equivalent values based on the investigation provided for in subdivision c; and

Perform other duties assigned by the board.

May pay benefits and consultant fees as necessary which are hereby appropriated from the fund.

Shall submit to the legislative management’s employee benefits programs committee any necessary or desirable changes in statutes relating to the administration of the fund.

Shall determine appropriate levels of service to be provided to members, including benefits counseling and preretirement programs.

Shall, through resolution, inform the state investment board, which is the administrative board of the retirement and investment office, the levels of services, goals, and objectives expected to be provided through the retirement and investment office.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 2; 2009, ch. 482, § 8.

15-39.1-06.
Organization of board.

The board may hold meetings as necessary for the transaction of business and a meeting may be called by the president or any two members of the board upon reasonable notice to the other members of the board. The president for the ensuing year must be elected at the first meeting following July first of each year.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1987, ch. 220, § 2; 1989, ch. 217, § 3; 1989, ch. 667, § 2; 1995, ch. 191, § 2.

15-39.1-07.
Vacancies — Rulemaking power.

Vacancies which may occur among the appointed members of the board must be filled by the governor and the appointee shall complete the term for which the original member was selected. The board may adopt such rules as may be necessary to fulfill the responsibilities of the board.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1.

15-39.1-08.
Compensation of members.

Members of the board, excluding ex officio members, are entitled to receive one hundred forty-eight dollars as compensation per day and necessary mileage and travel expenses as provided in sections 44-08-04 and 54-06-09 for attending meetings of the board. No member of the board may lose regular salary, vacation pay, vacation or any personal leave, or be denied right of attendance by the state or political subdivision thereof while serving on official business of the fund.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1985, ch. 219, § 1; 1997, ch. 169, § 2; 2011, ch. 48, § 4.

15-39.1-09.
Membership in fund and assessments — Employer payment of employee contribution. [Contingent effective date – See note]

Except as otherwise provided by law, every teacher is a member of the fund and must be assessed upon the teacher’s salary seven and seventy-five hundredths percent per annum, which must be deducted, certified, and paid monthly to the fund by the disbursing official of the governmental body by which the teacher is employed. Member contributions increase to nine and seventy-five hundredths percent per annum beginning July 1, 2012, and increase thereafter to eleven and seventy-five hundredths percent per annum beginning July 1, 2014. Except as otherwise provided by law, every governmental body employing a teacher shall pay to the fund eight and seventy-five hundredths percent per annum of the salary of each teacher employed by it. Contributions to be paid by a governmental body employing a teacher increase to ten and seventy-five hundredths percent per annum beginning July 1, 2012, and increase thereafter to twelve and seventy-five hundredths percent per annum beginning July 1, 2014. The required amount of member and employer contributions must be reduced to seven and seventy-five hundredths percent per annum effective on the July first that follows the first valuation showing a ratio of the actuarial value of assets to the actuarial accrued liability of the teachers’ fund for retirement that is equal to or greater than one hundred percent. The disbursing official of the governmental body shall certify the governmental body payments and remit the payments monthly to the fund.

Each employer, at its option, may pay the teacher contributions required by subsection 1 for all compensation earned after June 30, 1983. The amount paid must be paid by the employer in lieu of contributions by the employee. If an employer decides not to pay the contributions, the amount that would have been paid will continue to be deducted from compensation. If contributions are paid by the employer, they must be treated as employer contributions in determining income tax treatment under this code and the federal Internal Revenue Code. If contributions are paid by the employer, they may not be included as gross income of the teacher in determining tax treatment under this code and the Internal Revenue Code until they are distributed or made available. The employer shall pay these teacher contributions from the same source of funds used in paying compensation to the teachers. The employer shall pay these contributions by effecting an equal cash reduction in the gross salary of the employee or by an offset against future salary increases. If teacher contributions are paid by the employer, they must be treated for the purposes of this chapter in the same manner and to the same extent as teacher contributions made prior to the date the contributions were assumed by the employer. The option given employers by this subsection must be exercised in accordance with rules adopted by the board.

A person, except the superintendent of public instruction, who is certified to teach in this state by the education standards and practices board and who is first employed and entered upon the payroll of the superintendent of public instruction after January 6, 2001, may elect to become a participating member of the public employees retirement system. An election made by a person to participate in the public employees retirement system under this subsection is irrevocable. Nonteaching employees of the superintendent of public instruction, including the superintendent of public instruction, may elect to transfer to the public employees retirement system pursuant to section 54-52-02.13. Employees of the state board for career and technical education may elect to transfer to the public employees retirement system pursuant to section 54-52-02.14.

An individual who is first employed and entered upon the payroll of the state board for career and technical education after July 1, 2007, may elect to become a participating member of the public employees retirement system. An election made by an individual to participate in the public employees retirement system under this subsection is irrevocable.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1975, ch. 151, § 1; 1977, ch. 168, § 1; 1979, ch. 234, § 1; 1983, ch. 217, § 1; 1985, ch. 222, § 1; 1987, ch. 220, § 3; 1987, ch. 222, § 1; 1989, ch. 220, § 1; 1989, ch. 221, § 1; 1991, ch. 187, § 2; 1997, ch. 171, § 1; 1999, ch. 176, § 1; 2001, ch. 170, § 1; 2003, ch. 34, § 14; 2007, ch. 483, § 1; 2007, ch. 157, § 3; 2009, ch. 22, § 4; 2011, ch. 125, § 2; 2013, ch. 142, § 1.

Note.

Section 5 of chapter ch. 22, S.L. 2009, provides: “

APPLICATION.

Section 4 [which amends this section], of this Act applies to salaries earned after June 30, 2010.”

Section 7 of chapter ch. 22, S.L. 2009, provides: “

EXPIRATION DATE.

Section 4 [which amends this section], of this Act is effective until the ratio of the actuarial value of assets to the actuarial accrued liability of the teachers’ fund for retirement increases to ninety percent based upon the actuarial value of assets and expires on the July first that follows the first valuation that shows a ninety percent funded ratio. The board of trustees of the teachers’ fund for retirement shall notify the legislative council of the expiration date of section 4 of this Act.”

Section 14 of chapter ch. 157, S.L. 2007 provides: “

APPLICATION.

Sections 1, 6, 10, 11, 12, and 15 of this Act apply to salaries earned on and after July 1, 2007, and sections 2, 3 [which amends this section], 4, 5, 7, 8, 9, and 13 of this Act become effective on July 1, 2008.”

Section 17 of chapter ch. 157, S.L. 2007, provides: “

EXPIRATION DATE.

Section 3 of this Act [which amends this section] is effective until the ratio of the actuarial value of assets to the actuarial accrued liability of the teachers’ fund for retirement increases to ninety percent based upon the actuarial value of assets and expires on the July first that follows the first valuation that shows a ninety percent funded ratio. The board of trustees of the teachers’ fund for retirement shall notify the legislative council of the expiration date of section 3 of this Act.”

Section 3 of chapter 171, S.L. 1997 provides in part:

“Section 1 of this Act does not apply to existing contracts between school districts and their employees under which the school district pays the teacher contribution pursuant to subsection 2 of section 15-39.1-09.”

15-39.1-09.1.
Participation of nonpublic schoolteachers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1993, ch. 191, § 3.

15-39.1-10.
Eligibility for normal retirement benefits.

The following members who have acquired a vested right to a retirement annuity as set forth in section 15-39.1-11 are eligible to receive monthly lifetime normal unreduced retirement benefits under this section:

All tier one and tier two members who have attained the age of sixty-five years.

All tier one grandfathered members who have a combined total of years of service credit and years of age which equals or exceeds eighty-five.

All tier one nongrandfathered members and tier two members who are at least sixty years of age and who have a combined total of years of service credit and years of age which equals or exceeds ninety.

The amount of retirement benefits is two percent of the final average monthly salary of the member multiplied by the number of years of credited service. For the purposes of this subsection, final average monthly salary for a tier one member means one thirty-sixth of the total of the member’s highest annual salaries earned between July first of a calendar year and June thirtieth of the subsequent calendar year for any three years of service credit under the fund. For purposes of this subsection, final average monthly salary for a tier two member means one sixtieth of the total of the member’s highest annual salaries earned between July first of a calendar year and June thirtieth of the subsequent calendar year for any five years of service credit under the fund.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no member who retired on July 1, 1993, or after and is eligible to receive benefits under former chapter 15-39, chapter 15-39.1, or section 15-39.2-02, may receive benefits which are less than:

Ten dollars per month per year of teaching to twenty-five years.

Fifteen dollars per month per year of teaching over twenty-five years.

For a member who attains age seventy and one-half before January 1, 2020, the member’s required beginning date is no later than April first of the calendar year following the year the member attains age seventy and one-half or April first of the calendar year following the year the member terminates covered employment, whichever is later. For a member who attains age seventy and one-half after December 31, 2019, the member’s required beginning date is no later than April first of the calendar year following the year the member attains age seventy-two or April first of the calendar year following the year the member terminates covered employment, whichever is later. Payments must be made over a period of time which does not exceed the life expectancy of the member or the joint life expectancy of the member and the beneficiary. Payment of minimum distributions must be made in accordance with section 401(a)(9) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, and the regulations issued under that section, as applicable to governmental plans.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1975, ch. 151, § 2; 1977, ch. 168, § 2; 1979, ch. 234, § 2; 1979, ch. 235, § 2; 1983, ch. 218, § 2; 1985, ch. 220, § 1; 1987, ch. 222, § 2; 1989, ch. 221, § 2; 1989, ch. 222, § 1; 1991, ch. 189, § 1; 1993, ch. 192, § 1; 1995, ch. 191, § 3; 1997, ch. 171, § 2; 1997, ch. 172, § 1; 1999, ch. 175, § 2; 1999, ch. 177, § 1; 2001, ch. 171, § 1; 2005, ch. 147, § 2; 2007, ch. 157, § 4; 2009, ch. 162, § 2; 2011, ch. 124, § 2; 2011, ch. 125, § 3; 2013, ch. 141, § 2; 2015, ch. 136, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 133, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 136, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 3 of chapter 177, S.L. 1999, effective August 1, 1999, provides:

“

APPLICATION OF ACT.

Subsection 2 of Section 15-39.1-10 applies only to individuals who begin receiving benefits from the fund under chapter 15-39.1 after June 30, 1999, and applies to those benefits payable after June 30, 1999.”

Section 3 of chapter 171, S.L. 1997 provides in part:

“Section 2 of this Act applies only to individuals who begin receiving benefits from the fund under chapter 15-39.1 after June 30, 1997, and applies to those benefits payable after June 30, 1997.”

Section 3 of chapter 172, S.L. 1997, provides in part:

“Section 1 of this Act applies only to individuals who begin receiving benefits from the fund under chapter 15-39.1 after June 30, 1997, and applies to those benefits payable after June 30, 1997.”

Section 4 of chapter 192, S.L. 1993, provides that section 1 of the act, which amended this section, applies only to individuals who begin receiving monthly benefits from the fund under chapter 15-39.1 after June 30, 1993, and applies to those benefits payable after June 30, 1993.

15-39.1-10.1.
Postretirement adjustments.

Every person receiving monthly benefits from the fund on an account on which benefits were being paid on June 30, 1983, shall receive an increase in benefits beginning July 1, 1983, equal to fifteen percent of the person’s present annuity. The percentage must be adjusted, if necessary, so that the maximum increase would be no more than forty-five dollars per month. The fifteen percent increase in benefits must be adjusted in percentage so that no person receives less than one dollar per month per year of teaching credit.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 218, § 1.

15-39.1-10.2.
Postretirement adjustments.

Every person receiving monthly benefits from the fund on an account on which benefits were being paid on June 30, 1985, shall receive an increase in benefits beginning July 1, 1985, equal to one percent for each year the person has been retired under the fund. No member may receive more than a ten percent or more than a forty dollar per month increase in benefits under this section.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 220, § 2.

15-39.1-10.3.
Multiple plan membership — Eligibility for benefits — Amount of benefits.

For the purpose of determining vesting of rights and eligibility for benefits under this chapter, a teacher’s years of service credit is the total of the years of service credit earned in the fund and the years, with twelve months of compensation equal to a year, of service employment earned in any number of the following alternate plans:

The public employees retirement system.

The highway patrolmen’s retirement system.

If a teacher terminates eligible employment under the fund, if that teacher has not received a refund of member contributions, and if that teacher begins eligible employment in a plan described in paragraph 1 or 2 of subdivision a, that teacher may elect to remain an inactive member of the fund without refund of contributions. The board shall terminate the inactive status of a teacher under this subdivision if the teacher gains eligible employment under this chapter or if the teacher terminates eligible employment under a plan described in paragraph 1 or 2 of subdivision a.

Pursuant to rules adopted by the board, a teacher who has service credit in the fund and in any number of the alternate plans described in paragraphs 1 and 2 of subdivision a is entitled to benefits under this chapter.

A tier one member may elect to have benefits calculated using the benefit formula in subsection 2 of section 15-39.1-10 under either of the following calculation methods:

Using the three highest certified fiscal year salaries of this plan in the computation of final average salary and all service credit earned in this plan; or

Using the three highest certified fiscal year salaries of this plan combined with the alternate plan in the computation of final average salary and service credit not to exceed one year in any fiscal year when combined with the service credit earned in the alternate retirement plan.

A tier two member may elect to have benefits calculated using the benefit formula in subsection 2 of section 15-39.1-10 under either of the following calculation methods:

Using the five highest certified fiscal year salaries of this plan in the computation of final average salary and all service credit earned in this plan; or

Using the five highest certified fiscal year salaries of this plan combined with the alternate plan in the computation of final average salary and service credit not to exceed one year in any fiscal year when combined with the service credit earned in the alternate retirement plan.

If a teacher, who is eligible to participate in this fund, is also eligible to participate in an alternate retirement system, the employee is a member of the teachers’ fund for retirement for duties covered under this fund, and the employee is also a member of the public employees retirement system or highway patrolmen’s retirement system for duties covered by those alternate retirement systems. The employers shall pay the member and employer contributions at the rates currently existing for the applicable system.

If a teacher described in subdivision a was employed prior to August 1, 2003, and has dual member rights, the teacher may elect to begin participation in the alternate plan pursuant to the plan provisions on August 1, 2003, or may continue participation pursuant to the plan provisions in effect on July 31, 2003. A plan participation election is required by five p.m. on October 31, 2003. If an election is not received by the retirement plan, the participation and benefit calculation requirements of this chapter as of July 31, 2003, continue to be in effect for the teacher.

Under rules adopted by the board, an individual whose service credit was canceled when that individual received a refund of assessments at termination of employment under this chapter may, while that individual participates in a plan described in paragraph 1 or 2 of subdivision a of subsection 1, repurchase that service credit that was canceled.

Service credit may not exceed one year of service in any fiscal year in determining vesting and benefit eligibility.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 222, § 2; 1987, ch. 223, § 1; 1989, ch. 217, § 5; R.M. disapproved December 5, 1989, S.L. 1991, ch. 740; 2003, ch. 140, § 2; 2007, ch. 157, § 5.

Note.

Section 14 of chapter 157, S.L. 2007 provides: “

APPLICATION.

Sections 1, 6, 10, 11, 12, and 15 of this Act apply to salaries earned on and after July 1, 2007, and sections 2, 3, 4, 5 [which amends this section], 7, 8, 9, and 13 apply to salaries earned on and after July 1, 2008.”

15-39.1-10.4.
Postretirement adjustments.

An individual who, on June 30, 1987, is receiving benefits from the fund on an account paid under former chapter 15-39 is entitled to a monthly increase in that individual’s annuity. The monthly increase is fifteen dollars plus one dollar and fifty cents for every year benefits have been drawn from the fund, but cannot exceed an increase of seventy-five dollars per month. An individual who, on June 30, 1987, is receiving benefits from the fund on an account paid under this chapter is entitled to a monthly increase of one dollar and fifty cents for every year benefits have been drawn from the fund.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 222, § 4.

15-39.1-10.5.
Postretirement adjustments.

An individual who on June 30, 1989, is receiving monthly benefits from the fund on an account paid under this chapter or under former chapter 15-39 is entitled to receive an increase in benefits equal to five cents times the individual’s number of years of service credit under the fund times the number of years the individual has drawn benefits from the fund.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 222, § 2.

15-39.1-10.6.
Benefit limitations.

Benefits with respect to a member participating under former chapter 15-39 or chapter 15-39.1 or 15-39.2 may not exceed the maximum benefits specified under section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. 415], as amended, for governmental plans. The maximum dollar benefit applicable under section 415(b)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code must reflect any increases in this amount provided under section 415(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended. If a member’s benefit is limited by these provisions at the time of retirement or termination of employment, or in any subsequent year, the benefit paid in any following calendar year may be increased to reflect all cumulative increases in the maximum dollar limit provided under section 415(d) of the Internal Revenue Code for years after the year employment terminated or payments commenced, but not to more than would have been payable in the absence of the limits under section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code. If an annuitant’s benefit is increased by a plan amendment, after the commencement of payments, the member’s benefit may not exceed the maximum dollar benefit under section 415(b)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, adjusted for the commencement age and form of payment, increased as provided by section 415(d) of the Internal Revenue Code. If this plan must be aggregated with another plan to determine the effect of section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code on a member’s benefit, and if the benefit must be reduced to comply with section 415 of the Internal Revenue Code, then the reduction must be made pro rata between the two plans, in proportion to the member’s service in each plan.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 187, § 3; 2003, ch. 140, § 3; 2005, ch. 147, § 3; 2007, ch. 157, § 6; 2009, ch. 162, § 3; 2011, ch. 124, § 3; 2013, ch. 141, § 3; 2015, ch. 136, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 136, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 14 of chapter ch. 157, S.L. 2007 provides: “

APPLICATION.

Sections 1, 6 [which amends this section], 10, 11, 12, and 15 of this Act apply to salaries earned on and after July 1, 2007, and sections 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, 9, and 13 apply to salaries earned on and after July 1, 2008.”

15-39.1-10.7.
Postretirement adjustments.

An individual who on June 30, 1991, is receiving monthly benefits from the fund on an account paid under this chapter or under former chapter 15-39 is entitled to receive three dollars per month multiplied by the individual’s number of years of credited service for individuals who retired before 1980, two dollars per month multiplied by the individual’s number of years of credited service for individuals who retired after 1979 and before 1984, or one dollar per month multiplied by the individual’s number of years of credited service for individuals who retired after 1983 and who retire before July 1, 1991, or an increase of ten percent in the individual’s currently payable annuity, whichever is greater. The minimum monthly increase under this section is five dollars and the maximum monthly increase under this section is seventy-five dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 189, § 2.

15-39.1-10.8.
Postretirement adjustments.

An individual who on June 30, 1993, is receiving monthly benefits from the fund on an account paid under this chapter or under former chapter 15-39 is entitled to receive three dollars per month multiplied by the individual’s number of years of credited service for individuals who retired before 1980, two dollars and fifty cents per month multiplied by the individual’s number of years of credited service for individuals who retired after 1979 and before 1984, or one dollar per month multiplied by the individual’s number of years of credited service for individuals who retired after 1983 and who retire before July 1, 1993, or an increase of ten percent in the individual’s currently payable annuity, whichever is greater. The minimum monthly increase under this section is five dollars and the maximum monthly increase under this section is one hundred dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 192, § 2.

15-39.1-10.9.
Postretirement adjustment.

An individual who on June 30, 1997, is receiving monthly benefits from the fund on an account paid under this chapter or under former chapter 15-39 is entitled to receive an increase of thirty dollars per month.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 172, § 2.

Note.

This section applies to benefits payable after June 30, 1997, pursuant to section 3 of chapter 172, S.L. 1997.

15-39.1-10.10.
Postretirement adjustment.

An individual who on June 30, 1999, is receiving monthly benefits from the fund on an account paid under this chapter or under former chapter 15-39 is entitled to receive a monthly increase equal to an amount determined by taking two dollars per month multiplied by the member’s number of years of service credit plus one dollar per month multiplied by the number of years since the member’s retirement.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 177, § 2.

Note.

This section applies to benefits payable after June 30, 1999, pursuant to section 3 of chapter 177, S.L. 1999.